Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201016-1108
Submission of joint merger plan to voters.

If a merger plan is adopted pursuant to section 16-1107, the city council of each city adopting such plan shall submit the plan for approval by the registered voters at a primary or special election held on the same day in each of the cities which are parties to the plan, not less than one hundred eighty days prior to the next statewide general election. An election held pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with the Election Act.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 8.

Election Act, see section 32-101.